Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.030

State flower.

The native species, Rhododendron macrophyllum, is hereby designated as the official flower of the state of Washington.

[ 1959 c 29 s 1; 1949 c 18 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10964-200.]